src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propnoun_k11
 +Prop: k11 ;


LEXICON propnoun_h13
 +Prop: h13 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h13e
 +Prop: h13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h1e
 +Prop: h1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h24
 +Prop: h24 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h24e
 +Prop: h24e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h25
 +Prop: h25 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h25e
 +Prop: h25e ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h3
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h3
 +Prop: h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h3e
 +Prop: h3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h4
 +Prop: h4 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h4e
 +Prop: h4e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h5
 +Prop: h5 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h5e
 +Prop: h5e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h6e
 +Prop: h6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h9e
 +Prop: h9e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h8
 +Prop: h8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h8e
 +Prop: h8e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k_flt17
 +Prop: k_flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k_flt20
 +Prop: k_flt20 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k1
 +Prop: k1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k12
 +Prop: k12 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k14
 +Prop: k14 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k17
 +Prop: k17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k1e
 +Prop: k1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k21
 +Prop: k21 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k3
 +Prop: k3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k39e
 +Prop: k39e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k3e
 +Prop: k3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k43e
 +Prop: k43e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k46
 +Prop: k46 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k46e
 +Prop: k46e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k12_boe
 +Prop: k12_boe ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k6
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k6e
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k6
 +Prop: k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k52
 +Prop: k52 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k6e
 +Prop: k6e ;
 
LEXICON propnoun_k7
 +Prop: k7 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k8e
 +Prop: k8e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k8
 +Prop: k8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k9
 +Prop: k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k9e
 +Prop: k9e ;

LEXICON propnoun_org_k9
 +Prop+Sem/Org: k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt1
 +Prop: kv_flt1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt17
 +Prop: kv_flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt2
 +Prop: kv_flt2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt32
 +Prop: kv_flt32 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt6
 +Prop: kv_flt6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt8
 +Prop: kv_flt8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt9
 +Prop: kv_flt9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_org_kv1
 +Prop+Sem/Org: kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv1
 +Prop: kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv12e
 +Prop: kv12e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv13e
 +Prop: kv13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv1e
 +Prop: kv1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_fem_kv2
 +Prop+Sem/Fem: kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv2
 +Prop: kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv21
 +Prop: kv21 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv2e
 +Prop: kv2e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv3
 +Prop: kv3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv32e
 +Prop: kv32e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv3e
 +Prop: kv3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv6
 +Prop: kv6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv6e
 +Prop: kv6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv9
 +Prop: kv9 ;
