src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON names
Supra propnoun_k52 ;
Malala:Malal propnoun_kv1e ;
Viðareiði:Viðareið propnoun_h24 ;
Svøríki:Svørík propnoun_h25e ;
Jehova propnoun_h4 ;
Leynavatn propnoun_h5e ;
Bøur: propnoun_k12_boe ;
Ferrari propnoun_k52 ;
Ziskatrøðskúl:Ziskatrøðskúli propnoun_k1e ;
Kollafjørður:Kollafjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Sosialurin:Sosial propnoun_k11 ;
Countryfestivalur:Countryfestival propnoun_k6 ;
Nonnubarnagarður propnoun_k8e ;
Filippinurnar:Filippin propnoun_kv_flt1 ;
Norðoyggjar propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Bíggjar% kommuna:Bíggjar% kommun propnoun_kv1e ;
Hallgrímskirkja:Hallgrímskirkj propnoun_kv1e ;
Christianiasúkkla:Christianiasúkkl propnoun_kv1 ;
Margáir:Margá propnoun_kv_flt2 ; ! Plural regular
Mýrutrøð propnoun_kv3e ;
Ziskatrøð propnoun_kv3e ;
Eysturoy propnoun_kv6e ;
Suðuroy propnoun_kv6e ;
Reykjavík propnoun_kv6e ;
EB% Streym propnoun_plc_k6e ;
Mjólkarvirkið:Mjólkarvirk propnoun_h25e ;
Fjølnir propnoun_h4e ;
Jarðarráðið propnoun_h4e ;
Sundalagið propnoun_h6e ;
Leiðipikk propnoun_h9e ;
Heystfagnaður:Heystfagnað propnoun_k12 ;
Kongavarði:Kongavarð propnoun_k1e ;
Skálafjørður:Skálafjørð propnoun_k46e ;
Mjørkadalur:Mjørkadal propnoun_k8e ;
Eiðiskollur:Eiðiskoll propnoun_k9e ;
Keypsamtøka:Keypsamtøk propnoun_kv1 ;
Lavagøta:Lavagøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Nicolai% Mohrsgøta:Nicolai% Mohrsgøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Sodnhúsgøta:Sodnhúsgøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Svabosgøta:Svabosgøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Tróndargøta:Tróndargøt propnoun_kv1 ;
V.U.% Hammershaimbsgøta:V.U.% Hammershaimbsgøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Svíná propnoun_kv2 ;
Mylláin propnoun_kv2e ;
Debesartrøð propnoun_kv3e ;
Frúutrøð propnoun_kv3e ;
Millutjørn propnoun_kv3e ;
Pálshøll propnoun_kv3e ;
Tvøroyri+Err/Orth:Tvøroyris propnoun_kv32e ;
Norðoyggjar propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Tórsgøta:Tórsgøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Hvalba:Hvalb propnoun_kv1 ;
Hoydalur:Hoydal propnoun_k8 ;
Deyðadalur:Deyðadal propnoun_k8 ;
Sacramentodalur:Sacramentodal propnoun_k8 ;
Akrar propnoun_k_flt20 ;
Akr:Akrar propnoun_k_flt20 ;
Depil propnoun_k21 ;
Norðdepil propnoun_k21 ;
Gjógv propnoun_kv21 ;
Kolbanargjógv propnoun_kv21 ;
Gøtugjógv propnoun_kv21 ;
Skáli:Skál propnoun_k1 ;
Norðskáli:Norðskál propnoun_k1 ;
Múli:Múl propnoun_k1 ;
Hellur propnoun_kv_flt1 ;
Norröna:Norrön propnoun_org_kv1 ;
Gøta:Gøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Norðragøta:Norðragøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Syðrugøta:Syðrugøt propnoun_kv1 ;
Bøur:Bø propnoun_k12 ;
Signabøur:Signabø propnoun_k12 ;
Kirkjubøur:Kirkjubø propnoun_k12 ;
Vatnsoyrar propnoun_kv_flt32 ;
Vágar propnoun_kv_flt2 ;
Toftir propnoun_kv_flt2 ;
Norðtoftir propnoun_kv_flt2 ;
Svínáir propnoun_kv_flt2 ;
Eyðun propnoun_fem_kv2 ;
A-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
B-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
C-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
D-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
E-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
K-vitamin propnoun_kv2 ;
Ljósá propnoun_kv2 ;
Koltur propnoun_h13 ;
Vestmannasund propnoun_plc_h3 ;
Sund propnoun_h3 ;
Hvannasund propnoun_h3 ;
Haraldssund propnoun_h3 ;
Hov propnoun_h3 ;
Lambi:Lamb propnoun_k3 ;
Dímun propnoun_kv3 ;
Skopun propnoun_kv3 ;
Saksun propnoun_kv3 ;
Velbastaður:Velbastað propnoun_k14 ;
Porkeri:Porker propnoun_h24 ;
Eiði:Eið propnoun_h24 ;
Viðareiði:Viðareið propnoun_h24 ;
Ráð propnoun_h4 ;
Býráð propnoun_h4 ;
Víkarbyrgi:Víkarbyrg propnoun_h25 ;
Rómaríki:Rómarík propnoun_h25 ;
Rúmaríki:Rúmarík propnoun_h25 ;
Osmannaríki:Osmannarík propnoun_h25 ;
Vatikanríki:Vatikanríki propnoun_h25 ;
Garðaríki:Garðarík propnoun_h25 ;
Eysturríki:Eysturrík propnoun_h25 ;
Nøríki:Nørík propnoun_h25 ;
Svøríki:Svørík propnoun_h25 ;
Stykkið:Stykkið propnoun_h25 ;
Skarð propnoun_h5 ;
Leirvíksfjørður:Leirvíksfjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Lorvíksfjørður:Lorvíksfjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Fuglafjørður:Fuglafjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Kollafjørður:Kollafjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Skálafjørður:Skálafjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Søldarfjørður:Søldarfjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Oyndarfjørður:Oyndarfjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Funningsfjørður:Funningsfjørð propnoun_k46 ;
Kambsdalur:Kambsdal propnoun_plc_k6 ;
Skælingur:Skæling propnoun_k6 ;
Funningur:Funning propnoun_k6 ;
Vágur:Vág propnoun_k6 ;
Sandavágur:Sandavág propnoun_k6 ;
Seyrvágur:Seyrvág propnoun_k6 ;
Sørvágur:Sørvág propnoun_k6 ;
Trongisvágur:Trongisvág propnoun_k6 ;
Trungisvágur:Trungisvág propnoun_k6 ;
Miðvágur:Miðvág propnoun_k6 ;
D-markur:D-mark propnoun_k6 ;
Miðgarðsormur:Miðgarðsorm propnoun_k6 ;
Trøllabotnur:Trøllabotn propnoun_k6 ;
Hestur:Hest propnoun_k6 ;
Norðuroyggjar propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Suðuroyggjar:Suðuroy propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Føroyar:Føroy propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Orknoyar:Orknoy propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Runavík propnoun_kv6 ;
Sandvík propnoun_kv6 ;
Hattarvík propnoun_kv6 ;
Klaksvík propnoun_kv6 ;
Elduvík propnoun_kv6 ;
Rituvík propnoun_kv6 ;
Kvívík propnoun_kv6 ;
Fugloy propnoun_kv6 ;
Suðurstreymoy propnoun_kv6 ;
Norðurstreymoy propnoun_kv6 ;
Stóroy propnoun_kv6 ;
Nósoy propnoun_kv6 ;
Eysturoy propnoun_kv6 ;
Viðoy propnoun_kv6 ;
Dalur:Dal propnoun_k17 ;
Mikladalur:Mikladal propnoun_k17 ;
Norðradalur:Norðradal propnoun_k17 ;
Syðradalur:Syðradal propnoun_k17 ;
Gásadalur:Gásadal propnoun_k17 ;
Jorsalir:Jorsalir propnoun_k_flt17 ;
Glyvrar propnoun_kv_flt17 ;
Sandur:Sand propnoun_k7 ;
Langasandur:Langasand propnoun_k7 ;
Vesturtýskland propnoun_h8 ;
Eysturtýskland propnoun_h8 ;
Suðurtýskland propnoun_h8 ;
Norðurgrønland propnoun_h8 ;
Lapland propnoun_h8 ;
Hvítarussland propnoun_h8 ;
Norðurjútland propnoun_h8 ;
Húnaland propnoun_h8 ;
Týskland propnoun_h8 ;
Norðanland propnoun_h8 ;
Norðurland propnoun_h8 ;
Bláland propnoun_h8 ;
Miklagarður:Miklagarð propnoun_k8 ;
Miðgarður:Miðgarð propnoun_k8 ;
Orknoyggjar propnoun_kv_flt8 ;
Mariurokkur:Mariurokk propnoun_k9 ;
Strendur propnoun_kv_flt9 ;
Strond propnoun_kv9 ;
Atlantsfar propnoun_h5e ;
Slættaratindur:Slættaratind propnoun_k6e ;
Filippinurnar propnoun_kv_flt1 ;
Norðoyggjar propnoun_kv_flt6 ;
Góðvónarhøvd:Góðvónarhøvdi propnoun_k1e ;
Blankskál:Blankskáli propnoun_k1e ;
Jesuspáp:Jesuspápi propnoun_k1e ;
Føroyingasøga:Føroyingasøg propnoun_kv1e ;
Kirkja:Kirkj propnoun_kv1e ;
Norðstjørnan:Norðstjørnan propnoun_kv1e ;
Tróndarbók propnoun_kv12e ;
Oyri propnoun_kv32e ;
Tvøroyri propnoun_kv32e ;
Norðoyri propnoun_kv32e ;
Tvøroyri:Tvøroyr propnoun_kv32e ;
Jorsalaborg propnoun_kv2e ;
Landmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Fonnemark propnoun_kv2e ;
Pilmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Finnmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Lappmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Sandsmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Høstmark propnoun_kv2e ;
Keypmannahavn propnoun_kv2e ;
Langfjordhavn propnoun_kv2e ;
Lillehavn propnoun_kv2e ;
Papperhavn propnoun_kv2e ;
Fredrikshavn propnoun_kv2e ;
Fjareystur propnoun_h13e ;
Miðeystur propnoun_h13e ;
Danmørk propnoun_kv13e ;
Nørvasund propnoun_h3e ;
Ermarsund propnoun_h3e ;
Oyrarsund propnoun_h3e ;
Noreg propnoun_h3e ;
Gulating propnoun_h3e ;
Fjón propnoun_h3e ;
Internet propnoun_h3e ;
Eystarasalt propnoun_h3e ;
Skag:Skagi propnoun_k3e ;
Valhøll propnoun_kv3e ;
Danaveldi:Danaveld propnoun_h24e ;
Sviaríki:Sviarík propnoun_h24e ;
Evropasamveldið:Evropasamveldið propnoun_h24e ;
Sovjetsamveldið:Sovjetsamveldið propnoun_h24e ;
Norðurlandaráðið:Norðurlandaráðið propnoun_h24e ;
Portugal propnoun_h4e ;
Japan propnoun_h4e ;
Ungarn propnoun_h4e ;
Norðhavið propnoun_h4e ;
Indiahav propnoun_h5e ;
Kyrrahav propnoun_h5e ;
Miðjarðarhav propnoun_h5e ;
Atlantshav propnoun_h5e ;
Norðuratlantshav propnoun_h5e ;
Sikiloyggj propnoun_kv6e ;
Baskaland propnoun_h8e ;
Sandland propnoun_h8e ;
Zeeland propnoun_h8e ;
Fædreneland propnoun_h8e ;
Rongland propnoun_h8e ;
Myckland propnoun_h8e ;
Helland propnoun_h8e ;
Värmland propnoun_h8e ;
Finnland propnoun_h8e ;
Helgoland propnoun_h8e ;
Nederland propnoun_h8e ;
Kurland propnoun_h8e ;
Frisland propnoun_h8e ;
Hviterussland propnoun_h8e ;
Suðurjútland propnoun_h8e ;
Norðsjógvurin propnoun_k39e ;
Aldafaðir propnoun_k43e;
Slovakia:Slovaki propnoun_h1e ;
Albania:Albani propnoun_h1e ;
Bulgaria:Bulgari propnoun_h1e ;
Amerika:Amerik propnoun_h1e ;
Suðurevropa:Suðurevrop propnoun_h1e ;
Kolombia:Kolombi propnoun_h1e ;
India:Indi propnoun_h1e ;
Australia:Australi propnoun_h1e ;
Albania:Albani propnoun_h1e ;
Kalifornia:Kaliforni propnoun_h1e ;
Asia:Asi propnoun_h1e ;
Jugoslavia:jugoslavi propnoun_h1e ;
Amerika:Amerik propnoun_h1e ;
Afrika:Afrik propnoun_h1e ;
